Wyoming, session 2025, HB0213.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-21-1202(a) is amended to read:

1-21-1202. Duties of owners and renters; generally.

(a) Each owner and his agent renting or leasing a
residential rental unit shall maintain that unit in a safe
and sanitary condition fit for human habitation. Each
residential rental unit shall have operational electrical,
HB0213

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0521
heating and plumbing, with hot and cold running water,
unless otherwise agreed upon in writing by both parties.
provided, however, this section shall not prevent the
rental of seasonal rental units such as summer cabins which
are not intended to have such amenities.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0213